apertium-swa.swa.lexd
LEXICON III-IV-Stems
mti:ti # "Tree"
mnazi:nazi # "Coconut tree"
mtofaa:tofaa # "Apple tree"
mgomba:gomba # "Banana tree"
mdomo:domo # "Mouth"
mkono:kono # "Hand"
moyo:oyo # "Heart"
mchezo:chezo # "Game"
mwaka:aka # "Year"
ndege:ndege # "Bird"
mshtaka:shtaka # "accusation"
msiba:siba # "adversity,affliction"
mito:ito # "affluent"
mchezo:chezo # "amusement,game"
mfano:fano # "analogy"
mkato:kato # "apartment"
mtume:tume # "apostle"
mpopoo:popoo # "areca(tree)"
mshale:shale # "arrow"
mtego:tego # "artifice"
mgongo:gongo # "back"
mgongo:gongo # "backbone"
mtumba:tumba # "bale"
mgogoro:gogoro # "balk"
mwanzi:wanzi # "bamboo"
mgomba:gomba # "banana(tree)"
mbuyu:buyu # "baobab"
mgogoro:gogoro # "bar"
mdomo:domo # "barrel"
mgogoro:gogoro # "barrier"
msinga:singa # "beehive"
mshipi:shipi # "belt"
mbaraka:baraka # "benediction"
mbaraka:baraka # "blessing"
mwamba:wamba # "boulder"
mpaka:paka # "boundary"
mchongoma:chongoma # "bramble"
mkono:kono # "branch"
mchongoma:chongoma # "briar"
mdomo:domo # "brim"
msigo:sigo # "burden"
msyororo:syororo # "cable"
mkate:kate # "oake"
mfereji:fereji # "canal"
mwango:wango # "candlestick"
msinga:singa # "cannon"
mji:ji # "capital"
mzoga:zoga # "carcass"
mpiko:piko # "caress"
mwerezi:werezi # "cedar"
mnara:nara # "column"
mkato:kato # "compartment"
mzoga:zoga # "corpse"
mstari:stari # "crease"
msuto:suto # "curtain"
mwongo:wongo # "decimal"
muungu\ mdogo:uungu\ mdogo # "demi-god"
mgogoro:gogoro # "difficulty"
msinji:sinji # "ditch"
mtego:tego # "dodge"
mwimo:wimo # "doorkeeper"
mchirizi:chirizi # "duct"
msingo:singo # "eddy"
mfano:fano # "emblem"
mtambo:tambo # "engine"
mfano:fano # "example"
mzizi:zizi # "filament"
mwenge:wenge # "flambeau"
mguu:guu # "foot"
mfo:fo # "freshet"
mpaka:paka # "frontier"
mfuo:fuo # "furrow"
mchongoma:chongoma # "furse"
mlango:lango # "door,gate"
mshipi:shipi # "girdle"
muungu:uungu # "god"
mtambo:tambo # "gun-lock"
mchirizi:chirizi # "gutter"
mtamba:tamba # "heifer"
mmea:mea # "herb"
mgogoro:gogoro # "hindrance"
#mnong'ono:nong'ono # "whisper"
mwangaza:wangaza # "air"
mwanamke:wanamke # "housemaid"
mlio:lio # "howl"
muhindi:muhindi # "indian-corn"
mzungu:zungu # "invention"
mfaimbo:pao # "iron-bar"
mhimili:himili # "joist"
mdina:dina # "kingfisher"
mkoba:koba# "knapsack"
mfuko:fuko # "knapsack"
mjeledi:jeledi # "knout"
mwanga:wanga # "lamp-stand"
mkuki:kuki # "lance"
mfumo:fumo # "lance"
mchochoro:chochoro # "lane"
mruba:ruba # "leech"
mlaimbo:laimbo # "lever(iron)"
mkungu:kungu # "lid"
mshipa:shipa # "ligament"
mfano:fano # "like"
mdimu:dimu # "lime"
mpaka:paka # "boundary,frontier"
mfuo:fuo # "line"
mdomo:domo # "lip,beak"
mtamba:tamba # "load"
mwanga:wanga # "luminary"
mkoko:koko # "mangrove"
mwandiko:wandiko # "manuscript"
msungu:sungu # "marvel"
mshakiki:shakiki # "meat"
mwujiza:wujiza # "miracle"
mude\ wa\ mwezi:uda\ wa\ mwezi # "month"
mchoro:choro # "moulding"
milima:ilima # "mountain"
muomo:uomo # "moustache"
mkufu:kufu # "necklace"
msiipa:siipa # "nerve"
mshipi:shipi # "net"
mchungwa:chungwa # "orange"
mtumba:tumba # "paok"
mlango:lango # "pass"
mtaawanda:taawanda # "patten"
mguu:guu # "paw"
mchi:chi # "pestle"
mhimili:himili # "pillar"
mfuko:fuko # "pillow-case"
mbano:bano # "pincers"
msunobari:sunobari # "pine"
mtungi:tungi # "pitcher"
mmea:mea # "plant"
mfuko:fuko # "pocket"
mfano:fano # "portrait"
mfuko:fuko # "pouch"
mfano:fano # "precedent"
mwiba:wiba # "prickle"
mwujiza:wujiza # "prodigy"
mhimsli:himsli # "prop"
mtume:tume # "prophet"
mchi:chi # "ramify"
mdeki:deki # "ramrod"
mtetemo:tetemo # "rigor"
mchirizi:chirizi # "rill"
mchezo:chezo # "romp"
mzisi:zisi # "rootlet"
mfuo:fuo # "rut"
mkoba:koba # "sachel"
mfuko:fuko # "sachel"
mfuko:fuko # "sack"
mshipi:shipi # "sash"
mkoba:koba # "satchel"
mfuko:fuko # "satchel"
mjeledi:jeledi # "scourge"
mfai:fai # "scratch"
mfuo:fuo # "scratch"
mshono:shono # "seam"
mkato:kato # "section"
mfereji:fereji # "shoot"
mundu:undu # "sickle"
mbano:bano # "skewer"
mshikiki:shikiki # "skewer"
mwanzo:wanzo # "skirmish"
mfuo:fuo # "slit"
mrashi:rashi # "smelling-bottle"
moshi:oshi # "smoke"
mweko:weko # "spoon"
mkongojo:kongojo"staff"
mkafale:kafale # "stocks"
mkuyu:kuyu # "sycamore"
mkia:kia # "tail"
maumi:aumi # "thrill"
manyanya:anyanya # "tomato(plant)"
mnara:nara # "tower"
mwiko:wiko # "trowel"
mlimbiko:limbiko # "reserve"
mmea:mea # "vegetation"
mwangazami:wangazami # "ventilator"
mshipa:shipa # "vessel,vein"
mji:ji # "village,town"
mzabibu:zabibu # "vine"
mshipi:shipi # "waistband"
mkoba:koba # "wallet"
mfereji:fereji # "watercourse"
mjeledi:jeledi # "whip"
msonyo:sonyo # "whistling"
mwujiza:wujiza # "wonder"


LEXICON V-VI-Stems
blanketi:blanketi # "Blanket"
gari:gari # "Car"
dirisha:dirisha # "Window"
gazeti:gazeti # "Newspaper"
neno:neno # "Word,allegation"
shamba:shamba # "Farm"
jina:jina # "Name"
juma:juma # "Week"
swali:swali # "Question"
jibu:jibu # "Answer"
